Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.170

Denial, suspension, revocation of licenses, probationary orders—Subpoenas, witnesses, testimony, fees.

The director may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses, and/or the production of books or documents, anywhere in the state. The licensee or applicant shall have opportunity to make his or her defense, and may have such subpoenas issued as he or she desires. Subpoenas shall be served in the same manner as in civil cases in the superior court. Witnesses shall testify under oath which may be administered by the director. Testimony shall be recorded and may be taken by deposition under such rules as the director may prescribe. Witnesses, except complaining witnesses, shall be entitled to fees for attendance and travel, as provided for in chapter 2.40 RCW, as enacted or hereafter amended.

[ 2011 c 336 s 575; 1963 c 232 s 2; 1959 c 139 s 17.]